Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.600 and 2010 c 8 s 9072 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition, removing the key and effectively setting the brake thereon and, when standing upon any perceptible grade, turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway.(b) For purposes of this subsection, a motor vehicle with an engine that has been activated by a remote starter system is not considered unattended when the motor vehicle is locked, and the ignition keys are not in the motor vehicle.(2) The most recent driver of a motor vehicle ((which))that the driver has left standing unattended or has left standing after starting the engine by a remote starter system, who learns that the vehicle has become set in motion and has struck another vehicle or property, or has caused injury to any person, shall comply with the requirements of:(a) RCW 46.52.010 if his or her vehicle strikes an unattended vehicle or property adjacent to a public highway; or(b) RCW 46.52.020 if his or her vehicle causes damage to an attended vehicle or other property or injury to any person.(3) Any person failing to comply with subsection (2)(b) of this section ((shall be))is subject to the sanctions set forth in RCW 46.52.020.(4) For purposes of this section, "remote starter system" means any device installed in a motor vehicle that allows the engine of such vehicle to be started by remote or radio control.--- END ---